Massachusetts, session 194th, H965.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 2 of chapter 132B of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting after the definition of “Animal” the following:-

“Anticoagulant rodenticide”, any pesticide product that has a mode of action that
interferes with blood clotting including, but not limited to, the following active ingredients:
Brodifacoum, Bromadiolone, Chlorophacinone, Difenacoum, Difethialone, Diphacinonon, or
Warfarin.

SECTION 2. Section 5 of said chapter 132B of the General Laws, as so appearing, is
hereby amended by adding at the end thereof the following paragraph:-
of 3

The department, with the approval of the board, shall by regulation establish a process
and standards for the limited use of anticoagulant rodenticides by licensed applicators in public
health emergencies, provided that such process and standards provide for one-time indoor use in
a single location to address an urgent public health emergency, as determined by the state
department of public health and such use shall: (i) be limited to 14 days; (ii) be accompanied by
integrated pest management actions that include non-chemical methods and exclusionary
measures to control rodents; (iii) require additional labeling of anticoagulant rodenticides used,
including but not limited to, the name of the rodenticide clearly labeled on any bait box; (iv)
require written rationale for the need for anticoagulant rodenticides over other non-toxic short-
term alternatives; and (v) require applicators to report to the department after the 14-day
emergency use period and include a plan for ongoing rodent control at the location.
Regulations shall also include provisions for the emergency use of anticoagulant
rodenticides to protect drinking water supply, to control vectors for mosquito-borne illness, and
for emergent infectious disease control.
SECTION 3. Section 7 of said chapter 132B of the General Laws, as so appearing, is
hereby amended by adding at the end thereof the following paragraph:-
The subcommittee as established in section 3A of this chapter shall not register or
reregister anticoagulant rodenticides, except that it may register or reregister anticoagulant
rodenticides for emergency use, as provided by the department pursuant to section 5 of this
chapter.
SECTION 4. The department shall report annually and include on its website information
regarding the emergency use of anticoagulant rodenticides including, but not limited to, locations
of 3

where the anticoagulant rodenticide was used, the types and amounts used, the contents of
ongoing rodent control plans required in section 5 of chapter 132B, and relevant accompanying
documents.
SECTION 5. This Act shall take effect January 1, 2027.

of 3